District of Columbia statutes.
16-306

Notice of adoption proceedings.

(a)

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, due notice of pending adoption proceedings shall be given to each person whose consent is necessary thereto, immediately upon the filing of a petition. The notice shall be given by summons, by registered letter sent to the addressee only, or otherwise as ordered by the court.

(b)

A party who formally gives his consent to the proposed adoption, as provided by this chapter, thereby waives the requirement of notice to him pursuant to this section.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 539, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4603.09 and § 23-581.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-306.
1973 Ed., § 16-306.